North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108D. Medicaid and NC Health Choice Managed Care Programs.
Article 4. Prepaid Health Plans.
§ 108D-60.
BH IDD tailored plans.

BH IDD tailored plans shall be defined as capitated PHP contracts that meet all requirements in this Article pertaining to capitated PHP contracts, except as specifically provided in this section. With regard to BH IDD tailored plans, the following shall occur:

In the event of the discontinuation of the 1915(b)/(c) Waivers, the following essential components of the 1915(b)/(c) Waivers shall be included in the 1115 Waiver:

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall authorize, pay for, and manage services offered under the 1915(b)/(c) Waivers, including coverage of 1915(b)(3) services, within their capitation payments.

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall operate care coordination functions.

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall oversee home and community based services.

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall maintain closed provider networks for behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services and shall ensure network adequacy.

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall manage provider rates.

Entities operating BH IDD tailored plans shall provide Local Business Plans.

The State Consumer and Family Advisory Committees shall continue to operate and advise the Department and entities operating the BH IDD tailored plans.

During the contract term of the initial contracts for BH IDD tailored plans to begin one year after the implementation of the first contracts for standard benefit plans and to last four years, an LME/MCO shall be the only entity that may operate a BH IDD tailored plan. LME/MCOs operating BH IDD tailored plans shall receive all capitation payments under the BH IDD tailored plan contracts. Entities operating BH IDD tailored plan contracts shall conduct care coordination administrative functions for all services offered through the BH IDD tailored plans, and shall bear all risk for service utilization. This subdivision shall not be construed to preclude an entity operating a BH IDD tailored plan from engaging in incentives, risk sharing, or other contractual arrangements.

During the contract term of the initial contracts for BH IDD tailored plans to begin one year after the implementation of the first contracts for standard benefit plans and to last four years, BH IDD tailored plans shall be operated only by LME/MCOs that meet certain criteria established by the Department. Any LME/MCO desiring to operate a BH IDD tailored plan will make an application to the Department in response to this set of criteria. Approval to operate a BH IDD tailored plan will be contingent upon a comprehensive readiness review. The constituent counties of the existing LME/MCOs may change, or existing LME/MCOs may merge or be acquired by another LME/MCO, as allowed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, prior to operating a BH IDD tailored plan, provided that the Department ensures every county in the State is covered by an LME/MCO that operates a BH IDD tailored plan. The Department shall issue no more than seven and no fewer than five regional BH IDD tailored plan contracts and shall not issue any statewide BH IDD tailored plan contracts.

After the term of the initial contracts for BH IDD tailored plans to last four years, BH IDD tailored plan contracts will be the result of RFPs [requests for proposals] issued by the Department and the submission of competitive bids from nonprofit PHPs and entities operating the initial BH IDD tailored plan contracts.

LME/MCOs operating BH IDD tailored plans shall contract with an entity that holds a PHP license and that covers the services required to be covered under a standard benefit plan contract.

[Reserved for future codification.]

Entities authorized to operate BH IDD tailored plans shall be in compliance with applicable State law, regulations, and policy and shall meet certain criteria established by the Department. These criteria shall include the ability to coordinate activities with local governments, county departments of social services, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, and other related agencies.

BH IDD tailored plans shall cover the behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services excluded from standard benefit plan coverage under

G.S. 108D-35

(1) in addition to the services required to be covered by all PHPs under

G.S. 108D-35

.

Entities authorized to operate BH IDD tailored plans shall continue to manage non-Medicaid behavioral health services funded with federal, State, and local funding in accordance with Chapter 122C of the General Statutes and other applicable State and federal law, rules, and regulations.

Recipients described in G.S. 108D-40(a)(12) shall be automatically enrolled with an entity operating a BH IDD tailored plan and shall have the option to enroll with a PHP operating a standard benefit plan, provided that a recipient electing to enroll with a PHP operating a standard benefit plan would only have access to the behavioral health services covered by the standard benefit plans and would no longer have access to the behavioral health services excluded from standard benefit plan coverage under G.S. 108D-35(1) and provided that the recipient’s informed consent shall be required prior to the recipient’s enrollment with a PHP operating a standard benefit plan.

The Department may contract with entities operating BH IDD tailored plans under a capitated or other arrangement for the management of behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services for any recipients excluded from PHP coverage under G.S. 108D-40(a)(4), (5), (7), (10), (11), (12), and (13).

History.

2015-245, s. 4; 2018-48, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 14(a); 2021-62, s. 3.4A(a).

Transfer of Area Authority Fund Balances/County Disengagement.

Session Laws
2021-62, s. 3.5A(a)-(h), provides:
“(a) When a county disengages from one area authority and realigns with another area authority under

G.S. 122C-115

, a portion of the risk reserve and other funds of the area authority from which the county is disengaging shall be transferred to the area authority with which the county is realigning. The amount of risk reserve and other funds to be transferred shall be determined by the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) in accordance with a formula or formulas developed in accordance with this section.

“(b) Any formula developed by DHHS under this section shall consider the stability of both the area authority from which the county is disengaging and the area authority with which the county is realigning. The formula shall support the ability for each area authority to carry out its responsibilities under State law and shall support the successful operation of BH IDD tailored plans under

G.S. 108D-60

. The formula shall assure that the area authority from which the county is disengaging retains sufficient funds to pay any outstanding liabilities to health care providers, staff-related expenses, and other liabilities.

“(c) Upon the Secretary’s approval of a disengagement under
G.S. 122C-115(a3), the area authority from which the county is disengaging and the area authority with which the county is realigning shall provide DHHS with all financial information requested by DHHS that is necessary to determine the amount of funds to be transferred using the formula or formulas developed under this section.

“(d) Prior to finalizing any formula developed under this section, DHHS shall post the proposed formula on its website and provide notice of the proposed formula to all area authorities, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division. DHHS shall accept public comment on the proposed formula. DHHS shall post the final version of the formula on its website no later than August 1, 2021.

“(e) No later than October 15, 2021, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division on any formulas developed under this section and any funds transferred during the previous quarter. Beginning January 15, 2022, and quarterly thereafter through April 15, 2026, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division on any funds transferred as a result of disengagements during the previous quarter. A final quarterly report shall be due June 30, 2026, for the quarter ending on that date.

“(f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the development and application of the formula or formulas under this section shall be exempt from the rulemaking requirements under Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and the contested case provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“(g) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to disengagements approved by DHHS with an effective date on or after September 1, 2021.

“(h) This section shall expire on June 30, 2026.”

Choice in Accreditation for LME/MCOS Operating BH IDD Tailored Plans.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.17(a)-(c), provides: “(a) During the initial four-year contract term for Medicaid BH IDD tailored plans, as defined under

G.S. 108D-1

, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall not require, by contract or otherwise, any local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) to be accredited by any one specific accreditation organization. DHB shall require each LME/MCO awarded a BH IDD tailored plan contract to be accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation organization that has been selected by the LME/MCO and approved by DHB. DHB shall create a process by which DHB approves the accreditation organization selected by the LME/MCO.

“(b) No accreditation organization shall be approved by DHB for use by an LME/MCO under this section unless the accreditation organization meets, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:

“(1) Prior experience conducting accreditation reviews for managed care organizations in at least five other states within the United States or in at least two regions that correspond to the areas covered by the regional office locations of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

“(2) A review program that includes, at a minimum, standards for the following aspects of operation of the LME/MCO:

“a. Quality assurance.

“b. Provider credentialing.

“c. Utilization review.

“d. Enrollee rights and responsibilities.

“e. Medical records.

“f. Governance of the LME/MCO.

“g. Preventative health services.

“(3) Development of accreditation standards that include input from the medical, managed care organization, and health care consumer communities.

“(4) Reviews of, and updates to, the standards listed under subdivision (3) of this subsection at regular intervals not exceeding two years.

“(5) An internal quality assurance program that ensures the quality and continuity of its review program.

“(6) No current involvement in the operation of the LME/MCO or the delivery of health services to any of its enrollees.

“(7) No contract or consultations with the LME/MCO within the prior two years for any services other than accreditation.

“(c) All accreditation organizations approved for use by an LME/MCO under this section shall be required to submit their standards for accreditation to DHB every three years to maintain approval for use by the LME/MCO.”

Editor’s Note.

Subdivision (10) of Session Laws
2015-245, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws
2018-48, s. 1, was codified as this section by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(9), effective October 1, 2019.

Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(9) provides: “Subdivision (10) of Section 4 of S.L. 2015-245, as amended by Section 1 of S.L. 2018-48, is codified as

G.S. 108D-60

, except that the following are not codified:

“a. The first and third sentences of subdivision (10).

“b. The language in sub-subdivision a. appearing before sub-sub-subdivision 1.

“c. The word ’currently’ shall be removed from sub-sub-sub-subdivision I. of sub-sub-subdivision 1. of sub-subdivision a.

“d. Sub-sub-subdivision 6. of sub-subdivision a.

“e. Sub-subdivisions b., c., and d.”

Pursuant to Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(b), references to “the Department” or “the Department of Health and Human Services” were substituted for “DHHS,” as appropriate.

Session Laws
2020-88, s. 12(a), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services may contract with an Indian managed care entity (IMCE) or an Indian health care provider (IHCP), as defined under
42 C.F.R. § 438.14(a), to assist in the provision of health care or health care-related services to Medicaid and NC Health Choice beneficiaries who are members of federally recognized tribes or who are eligible to enroll in an IMCE. Contracts may include health care or health care-related services as agreed upon with the IMCE or IHCP, as approved by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services and as allowed by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), including, but not limited to, the following services:

“(1) Primary care case management as a primary care case managed system or entity, as described in
42 C.F.R. § 438.2.

“(2) Utilization management and referrals.

“(3) The management or provision of home- and community-based services under a 1915(c) waiver.

“(4) The management or provision of specialized services covered by a behavioral health and intellectual/developmental disabilities (BH/IDD) tailored plan in accordance with
G.S. 108D-60(8).

“Coverage provided by the IMCE or IHCP may be more permissive, but no more restrictive, than Medicaid or NC Health Choice medical coverage policy adopted or amended by the Department of Health and Human Services; however, the coverage shall be in compliance with federal regulations and policies related to the receipt of federal funding for these health care or health care-related services.”

Session Laws
2020-88, s. 12(d), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to seek approval from CMS and submit any necessary State Plan Amendments and waivers, or any amendments thereto, to implement the provisions of this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-62, s. 3.4A(a), effective June 29, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

§ 108D-65.
Role of the Department.

The role and responsibility of the Department during Medicaid transformation shall include the following activities and functions:

Submit to CMS a demonstration waiver application pursuant to Section 1115 of the Social Security Act and any other waivers and State Plan amendments necessary to accomplish the requirements of this Article within the required time frames.

Define six regions comprised of whole contiguous counties that reasonably distribute covered populations across the State to ensure effective delivery of health care and achievement of the goals of Medicaid transformation set forth in

G.S. 108D-30

. Every county in the State must be assigned to a region.

Oversee, monitor, and enforce capitated PHP contract performance.

Ensure sustainability of the transformed Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

Set rates, including the following:

Capitation rates that are actuarially sound. Actuarial calculations must include utilization assumptions consistent with industry and local standards. Capitation rates shall be risk adjusted and shall include a portion that is at risk for achievement of quality and outcome measures, including value-based payments, provided that capitated PHP contracts shall not require any withhold arrangements, as defined in 42 C.F.R. § 438.6, during the first 18 months of the demonstration. Any withhold arrangements required under a capitated PHP contract after the first 18 months of the demonstration shall not withhold an amount of a PHP’s capitation payment that exceeds three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the PHP’s total capitation payment. The Department shall not require community reinvestment as a condition for a PHP’s receipt of any at-risk portion of the capitation rate.

Appropriate rate floors for in-network primary care physicians, specialist physicians, and pharmacy dispensing fees to ensure the achievement of transformation goals.

Rates for services in the remaining fee-for-service programs.

Enter into capitated PHP contracts for the delivery of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice services described in

G.S. 108D-35

. All contracts shall be the result of requests for proposals (RFPs) issued by the Department and the submission of competitive bids by PHPs. The Department shall develop standardized contract terms, to include at a minimum, the following:

Risk-adjusted cost growth for its enrollees must be at least two percentage (2%) points below national Medicaid spending growth as documented and projected in the annual report prepared for CMS by the Office of the Actuary for nonexpansion states.

A requirement that PHP spending for prescribed drugs, net of rebates, ensures the State realizes a net savings for the spending on prescription drugs. All PHPs shall be required to use the same drug formulary, which shall be established by the Department.

A minimum medical loss ratio of eighty-eight percent (88%) for health care services, with the components of the numerator and denominator to be defined by the Department. The minimum medical loss ratio shall be neither higher nor lower than eighty-eight percent (88%). The Department shall not require community reinvestment as a result of a PHP’s failure to comply with any minimum medical loss ratio.

[Reserved for future codification.]

A requirement that all PHPs assure that enrollees who do not elect a primary care provider will be assigned to one.

Terms that, to the extent not inconsistent with federal law or regulations, or State law or rule, ensure PHPs will be subject to certain requirements of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes in accordance with this sub-subdivision. Compliance with these requirements shall be overseen and enforced by the Department. The requirements to be incorporated in the terms of the capitated PHP contracts are in the following sections of Chapter 58, and the requirements in these sections shall be applicable to PHPs in the manner in which these sections are applicable to insurers and health benefits plans, as the context requires:

G.S. 58-3-190

, Coverage required for emergency care, excluding subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection (g).

G.S. 58-3-191

, Managed care reporting and disclosure requirements.

G.S. 58-3-200(c), Miscellaneous insurance and managed care coverage and network provisions.

G.S. 58-3-221

, Access to nonformulary and restricted access prescription drugs.

G.S. 58-3-225

, Prompt claim payments under health benefit plans.

G.S. 58-3-227

, Health plans fee schedules.

G.S. 58-3-231

, Payment under locum tenens arrangements.

G.S. 58-50-26

, Physician services provided by physician assistants.

G.S. 58-50-30

, Right to choose services of certain providers.

G.S. 58-50-270

, Definitions.

G.S. 58-50-275

, Notice contact provision.

G.S. 58-50-280

, Contract amendments.

G.S. 58-50-285

, Policies and procedures.

G.S. 58-50-295

, Prohibited contract provisions related to reimbursement rates.

G.S. 58-51-37

, Pharmacy of choice. The requirements of this statute to be incorporated into capitated PHP contracts shall apply to all PHPs regardless of whether a PHP has its own facility, employs or contracts with physicians, pharmacists, nurses, or other health care personnel, and dispenses prescription drugs from its own pharmacy to enrollees.

G.S. 58-51-38

, Direct access to obstetrician-gynecologists.

G.S. 58-67-88

, Continuity of care.

A requirement that all participation agreements between a PHP and a health care provider incorporate specific terms implementing sub-sub-subdivisions 3, 5, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 13 of sub-subdivision f. of this subdivision.

Prior to issuing the RFPs [requests for proposals] required by subdivision (6) of this section, consult, in accordance with

G.S. 12-3(15)

, with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice on the terms and conditions of the requests for proposals (RFPs) for the solicitation of bids for statewide and regional capitated PHP contracts.

Develop and implement a process for recipient assignment to PHPs. Criteria for assignment shall include at least the recipient’s family unit, including foster family and adoptive placement, quality measures, and primary care physician.

Define methods to ensure program integrity against provider fraud, waste, and abuse at all levels.

This sub-subdivision shall not be construed to require the Department to utilize contract terms that would require PHPs to cover services that are not covered by the Medicaid program.

History.

2015-245, s. 5; 2016-121, s. 2(c); 2018-49, s. 6(b); 2019-81, ss. 13, 14(a), (b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2015-245, s. 5, as amended by Session Laws
2016-121, s. 2(c), and Session Laws
2018-49, s. 6(b), was codified as this section by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(10), effective October 1, 2019.

Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(10) provides: “(10) Section 5 of S.L. 2015-245, as amended by Section 2(c) of S.L. 2016-121, Section 6(b) of S.L. 2018-49, and Section 13 of this act, is codified as

G.S. 108D-65

, except that the following are not codified:

“a. Sub-subdivision d. of subdivision (6).

“b. Subdivisions (10), (11), (12), and (13).”

Pursuant to Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(b), references to “the Department” or “the Department of Health and Human Services” were substituted for “DHHS,” as appropriate.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.19A(a), (b), provides: “(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 108D-65(6)b., for the prepaid health plan capitated contracts required under Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes, the reimbursement for the ingredient cost for prescription drugs and the prescription drug dispensing fee shall be set at one hundred percent (100%) of the Medicaid fee-for-service reimbursement, pursuant to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' National Drug Acquisition Cost and the cost of the dispensing study conducted on behalf of the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits.

“(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and expires June 30, 2023.” This section became effective November 18, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 108D-70.
Advanced Medical Homes.

PHPs shall be required to implement an Advanced Medical Home care management program but shall not be required to contract with any particular entity as an Advanced Medical Home. A PHP may contract with any entity to serve as an Advanced Medical Home or may create its own Advanced Medical Home care management program.

History.

2018-49, s. 7; 2019-81, s. 14(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-245, s. 7A, as added by Session Laws 2018-49, s. 7, was codified as this section by Session Laws 2019-81, s. 14(a)(11), effective October 1, 2019.